Rhode Island statutes. Title 18 Fiduciaries
Chapter 1 Application of Laws to Trusts

18-1-1.
Law expressly applicable when property is within state.

Whenever a person, whether or not a resident of this state and whether or not a citizen of the United States, subsequently creates a trust of personal property by deed, agreement, will, or otherwise, and: (1) the instrument creating the trust provides in substance that it shall be construed and regulated by the law of this state, (2) the trust is to be or is in fact administered in this state, and (3) the property, or the instruments or securities representing or evidencing the property, or the major part in value of the property, is or are situated within this state at the time of the creation of the trust, the validity, construction, effect, and administration of the trust shall be determined and governed by the law of this state without reference to the law of any other state.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 486, § 22; P.L. 1941, ch. 977, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

18-1-1

.

18-1-2.
Law expressly applicable when trustees are within state.

Whenever a person, whether or not a resident of this state and whether or not a citizen of the United States, subsequently creates a trust of personal property by deed, agreement, will, or otherwise, and: (1) the instrument creating the trust provides in substance that it shall be construed and regulated by the law of this state, (2) the trust is to be or is in fact administered in this state, and (3) the trustee, or if more than one at least one of them, is a resident of this state or a domestic corporation or national bank located within this state duly authorized by law to act as trustee, the validity, construction, effect, and administration of the trust shall be determined and governed by the law of this state without reference to the law of any other state.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 486, § 23; P.L. 1941, ch. 977, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

18-1-2

.

18-1-3.
Law expressly applicable to trusts created by residents.

Whenever a person, who is at the time a resident of this state, subsequently creates a trust of personal property by deed, agreement, will, or otherwise, and the instrument creating the trust provides in substance that it shall be wholly or partially construed and regulated by the law of this state, the validity, construction, effect, and administration of the trust shall in whole, or to the extent provided in the instrument, be determined and governed by the law of this state without reference to the law of any other state.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 486, § 24; P.L. 1941, ch. 977, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

18-1-3

.

18-1-4.
Prior trusts unaffected.

Nothing in this chapter shall, by implication or otherwise, in any manner affect any trust created before January 28, 1941.

History of Section.

P.L. 1941, ch. 977, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

18-1-4

.